Massachusetts, session 194th, H1265.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
The commissioner of insurance shall conduct an investigation and study of the impact of
geographic location data in automobile insurance rate calculation. The commissioner shall
evaluate, at a minimum: (1) the automobile insurance premiums for each zip code in the
commonwealth; (2) the difference in automobile insurance premiums for drivers with equivalent
driving factors, such as accidents and miles driven per year, in low income, moderate income,
and high income zip codes; (3) the risk factors for each zip code in the commonwealth; and (4)
the discriminatory impact on drivers in low and moderate income zip codes. The commissioner
shall make recommendations and shall submit findings to the joint committee on transportation
and to the house and senate committees on ways and means not later than December 31, 2026.
of 1